Colorado, session 2026A, SB095.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-240-139, amend
(1)(b)(V)(B) and (1)(b)(V)(C); and add (1)(b)(V)(D) as follows:
12-240-139. Injuries to be reported - exemptions - penalty for
failure to report - immunity from liability - definitions.
(1) (b) (V) A licensee, nurse, or certified midwife who performs a
medical forensic examination as described in subsection (1)(b)(I) of this
section shall inform the victim:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(B) Of the contact information for the nearest community-based
victim advocate pursuant to section 13-90-107 (1)(k)(II) if the victim makes
a medical report pursuant to subsection (1)(b)(I)(B) of this section or an
anonymous report pursuant to subsection (1)(b)(I)(C) of this section; and
(C) That any forensic medical evidence collected must be
maintained until after the assailant may no longer be prosecuted for the
crime and that the victim must be notified prior to the destruction of such
THE evidence; AND
(D) HOW TO DETERMINE WHEN THE TESTING RELATED TO THE
MEDICAL FORENSIC EXAMINATION IS COMPLETE AND HOW TO OBTAIN THE
RESULTS AND RECORDS.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-255-133.5, amend
(1)(b) and (1)(c); and add (1)(d) as follows:
12-255-133.5. Licensee duties related to medical forensic
evidence.
(1) A licensee who performs a medical forensic examination as
described in section 12-240-139 (1)(b)(I) shall inform the victim:
(b) Of the contact information for the nearest community-based
victim advocate pursuant to section 13-90-107 (1)(k)(II) if the victim makes
a medical report pursuant to section 12-240-139 (1)(b)(I)(B) or an
anonymous report pursuant to section 12-240-139 (1)(b)(I)(C); and
(c) That any forensic medical evidence collected must be maintained
until after the assailant may no longer be prosecuted for the crime and that
the victim must be notified prior to the destruction of such THE evidence;
AND
(d) HOW TO DETERMINE WHEN THE TESTING RELATED TO THE
MEDICAL FORENSIC EXAMINATION IS COMPLETE AND HOW TO OBTAIN THE
RESULTS AND RECORDS.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 13-20-1102 as
follows:
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-095

13-20-1102. Motion to dismiss - appeal - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "COMPLAINT" MEANS A PETITION OR CROSS-COMPLAINT.
(b) "DEFENDANT" MEANS A RESPONDENT OR CROSS-DEFENDANT.
(c) "PLAINTIFF" MEANS A PETITIONER OR CROSS-COMPLAINANT.
(d) "PROTECTED STATEMENT BY A VICTIM-SURVIVOR" MEANS:
(I) ANY WRITTEN OR ORAL STATEMENT OR WRITING MADE IN
CONNECTION WITH ANY PHASE OF A CRIMINAL INVESTIGATION OR
PROCEEDING;
(II) ANY WRITTEN OR ORAL STATEMENT OR WRITING MADE IN
CONNECTION WITH AN INVESTIGATION CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO TITLE IX
OF THE FEDERAL "EDUCATION AMENDMENTS OF 1972", 20 U.S.C. SEC. 1681;
(III) ANY WRITTEN OR ORAL STATEMENT OR WRITING MADE IN
CONNECTION WITH A CHILD WELFARE INVESTIGATION;
(IV) ANY WRITTEN OR ORAL STATEMENT OR WRITING MADE IN
CONNECTION WITH A PETITION FOR CIVIL PROTECTION ORDER PURSUANT TO
ARTICLE 14 OF THIS TITLE 13 OR AN EXTREME RISK PROTECTION ORDER
PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 14.5 OF THIS TITLE 13;
(V) ANY WRITTEN OR ORAL STATEMENT OR WRITING TO ANY PERSON
REQUIRED TO REPORT SUSPECTED CHILD ABUSE OR NEGLECT PURSUANT TO
SECTION 19-3-304; AND
(VI) ANY WRITTEN OR ORAL STATEMENT OR WRITING MADE IN
CONNECTION WITH ANY OTHER QUASI-JUDICIAL PROCEEDING.
(e) "VICTIM-SURVIVOR" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS ALLEGED TO
BE A VICTIM OF A CRIME CHARGED IN THE PRESENT CASE WHICH INVOLVES
DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 18-6-800.3; UNLAWFUL
SEXUAL BEHAVIOR, AS DESCRIBED IN PART 4 OF ARTICLE 3 OF TITLE 18;
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-095

STALKING, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 18-3-602; HUMAN TRAFFICKING FOR
INVOLUNTARY SERVITUDE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 18-3-503; OR HUMAN
TRAFFICKING FOR SEXUAL SERVITUDE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 18-3-504.
(2) (a) A CAUSE OF ACTION AGAINST A PERSON ARISING FROM ANY
PROTECTED STATEMENT BY A VICTIM-SURVIVOR IS SUBJECT TO A SPECIAL
MOTION TO DISMISS UNLESS THE COURT DETERMINES THAT THE PLAINTIFF
HAS ESTABLISHED THAT THERE IS A REASONABLE LIKELIHOOD THAT THE
PLAINTIFF WILL PREVAIL ON THE CLAIM.
(b) IN MAKING ITS DETERMINATION, THE COURT SHALL CONSIDER THE
PLEADINGS AND SUPPORTING AND OPPOSING AFFIDAVITS STATING THE FACTS
UPON WHICH THE LIABILITY OR DEFENSE IS BASED.
(c) IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT THE PLAINTIFF HAS
ESTABLISHED A REASONABLE LIKELIHOOD THAT THE PLAINTIFF WILL PREVAIL
ON THE CLAIM, THE COURT'S DETERMINATION IS NOT ADMISSIBLE AS
EVIDENCE AT ANY LATER STAGE OF THE CASE OR AT ANY SUBSEQUENT
PROCEEDING, AND NO BURDEN OF PROOF OR DEGREE OF PROOF OTHERWISE
APPLICABLE IS AFFECTED BY THE COURT'S DETERMINATION AT ANY LATER
STAGE OF THE CASE OR AT ANY SUBSEQUENT PROCEEDING.
(3) THE SPECIAL MOTION MUST BE FILED WITHIN SIXTY-THREE DAYS
AFTER THE SERVICE OF THE COMPLAINT OR, IN THE COURT'S DISCRETION, AT
A LATER TIME UPON TERMS IT DEEMS PROPER. THE COURT SHALL SCHEDULE
THE MOTION FOR A HEARING NOT MORE THAN TWENTY-EIGHT DAYS AFTER
THE SERVICE OF THE MOTION UNLESS THE DOCKET CONDITIONS OF THE
COURT REQUIRE A LATER HEARING.
(4) ALL DISCOVERY PROCEEDINGS IN THE ACTION ARE STAYED UPON
THE FILING OF A NOTICE OF MOTION MADE PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION. THE
STAY OF DISCOVERY REMAINS IN EFFECT UNTIL NOTICE OF ENTRY OF THE
ORDER RULING ON THE MOTION. NOTWITHSTANDING THIS SUBSECTION (4),
THE COURT MAY, ON NOTICED MOTION AND FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN, ORDER
THAT SPECIFIED DISCOVERY BE CONDUCTED.
(5) IN ANY ACTION SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION, A
PREVAILING DEFENDANT ON A SPECIAL MOTION TO DISMISS IS ENTITLED TO
RECOVER THE DEFENDANT'S ATTORNEY FEES AND COSTS. IF THE COURT
FINDS THAT A SPECIAL MOTION TO DISMISS IS FRIVOLOUS OR IS SOLELY
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-095

INTENDED TO CAUSE UNNECESSARY DELAY, PURSUANT TO PART 1 OF
ARTICLE 17 OF THIS TITLE 13, THE COURT SHALL AWARD COSTS AND
REASONABLE ATTORNEY FEES TO A PLAINTIFF PREVAILING ON THE MOTION.
(6) IN THE CASE OF AN ORDER GRANTING OR DENYING A SPECIAL
MOTION TO DISMISS IN COUNTY COURT, THE ORDER IS IMMEDIATELY
APPEALABLE TO THE DISTRICT COURT. IN THE CASE OF AN ORDER GRANTING
OR DENYING A SPECIAL MOTION TO DISMISS IN DISTRICT COURT, THE ORDER
IS IMMEDIATELY APPEALABLE TO THE COURT OF APPEALS.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 13-22-203.5 as
follows:
13-22-203.5. Sexual harassment or sexual misconduct dispute -
determination of applicability - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "PREDISPUTE ARBITRATION AGREEMENT" MEANS ANY
AGREEMENT TO ARBITRATE A DISPUTE THAT HAS NOT ARISEN AT THE TIME
OF MAKING THE AGREEMENT.
(b) "PREDISPUTE JOINT-ACTION WAIVER" MEANS AN AGREEMENT,
WHETHER OR NOT PART OF A PREDISPUTE ARBITRATION AGREEMENT, THAT
PROHIBITS OR WAIVES THE RIGHTS OF A PARTY TO THE AGREEMENT FROM
PARTICIPATING IN A JOINT ACTION, CLASS ACTION, OR COLLECTIVE ACTION
IN A JUDICIAL, ARBITRAL, ADMINISTRATIVE, OR OTHER FORUM CONCERNING
A DISPUTE THAT HAS NOT ARISEN AT THE TIME OF MAKING THE AGREEMENT.
(c) "SEXUAL HARASSMENT DISPUTE" MEANS A DISPUTE RELATING TO
CONDUCT THAT IS ALLEGED TO CONSTITUTE SEXUAL HARASSMENT
PURSUANT TO THE "COLORADO ANTI-DISCRIMINATION ACT", PARTS 3 TO 8
OF ARTICLE 34 OF TITLE 24, OR ANY OTHER APPLICABLE FEDERAL, STATE, OR
TRIBAL LAW.
(d) "SEXUAL MISCONDUCT DISPUTE" MEANS A DISPUTE INVOLVING
SEXUAL MISCONDUCT, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 13-80-103.7 (2).
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF LAW TO THE CONTRARY,
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-095

A PREDISPUTE ARBITRATION AGREEMENT OR PREDISPUTE JOINT-ACTION
WAIVER IS NOT VALID OR ENFORCEABLE UPON REQUEST OF AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO ALLEGES CONDUCT THAT RESULTS IN A SEXUAL HARASSMENT DISPUTE
OR A SEXUAL MISCONDUCT DISPUTE, OR UPON REQUEST OF A NAMED
REPRESENTATIVE OF A JOINT ACTION, CLASS ACTION, OR COLLECTIVE ACTION
THAT RESULTS IN A SEXUAL HARASSMENT DISPUTE OR A SEXUAL
MISCONDUCT DISPUTE.
(3) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO AN AGREEMENT TO ARBITRATE. THE
COURT, RATHER THAN AN ARBITRATOR, SHALL DETERMINE THE VALIDITY
AND ENFORCEABILITY OF A PREDISPUTE ARBITRATION AGREEMENT AND
PREDISPUTE JOINT-ACTION WAIVER REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE PARTY
RESISTING ARBITRATION CHALLENGES THE PREDISPUTE ARBITRATION
AGREEMENT OR PREDISPUTE JOINT-ACTION WAIVER, SPECIFICALLY OR IN
CONJUNCTION WITH OTHER TERMS OF THE CONTRACT THAT CONTAIN A
PREDISPUTE ARBITRATION AGREEMENT OR PREDISPUTE JOINT-ACTION
WAIVER, AND REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE PREDISPUTE ARBITRATION
AGREEMENT OR PREDISPUTE JOINT-ACTION WAIVER DELEGATES VALIDITY
AND ENFORCEABILITY DETERMINATIONS TO AN ARBITRATOR.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 13-90-101.5 as
follows:
13-90-101.5. Remote testimony by forensic scientists.
UPON THE REQUEST OF A PARTY AND CONSENT OF BOTH PARTIES, A
JUDGE SHALL ALLOW A FORENSIC SCIENTIST TO TESTIFY REMOTELY IN A
CRIMINAL PROCEEDING.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 16-10-402.5 as
follows:
16-10-402.5. Use of closed-circuit television - victims of certain
offenses involving domestic violence, unlawful sexual behavior,
stalking, or human trafficking - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "CLOSED-CIRCUIT TELEVISION" MEANS A DIRECT, CLOSED-LOOP
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-095

AUDIO AND VIDEO TRANSMISSION SYSTEM THAT ALLOWS PRIVATE VIEWING
AND IS NOT PUBLICLY BROADCAST, AND MAY INCLUDE THE USE OF OTHER
DIGITAL OR WIRELESS TECHNOLOGIES.
(b) "DOMESTIC VIOLENCE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
18-6-800.3.
(c) "HUMAN TRAFFICKING FOR INVOLUNTARY SERVITUDE" HAS THE
MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 18-3-503.
(d) "HUMAN TRAFFICKING FOR SEXUAL SERVITUDE" HAS THE
MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 18-3-504.
(e) "STALKING" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 18-3-602.
(f) "UNLAWFUL SEXUAL BEHAVIOR" MEANS UNLAWFUL SEXUAL
BEHAVIOR DESCRIBED IN PART 4 OF ARTICLE 3 OF TITLE 18.
(g) "VICTIM-SURVIVOR" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS ALLEGED TO
BE A VICTIM OF A CRIME CHARGED IN THE PRESENT CASE WHICH INVOLVES
DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, UNLAWFUL SEXUAL BEHAVIOR, STALKING, HUMAN
TRAFFICKING FOR INVOLUNTARY SERVITUDE, OR HUMAN TRAFFICKING FOR
SEXUAL SERVITUDE.
(2) (a) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION, IN
ANY PROSECUTION FOR A CRIME INVOLVING DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, UNLAWFUL
SEXUAL BEHAVIOR, STALKING, HUMAN TRAFFICKING FOR INVOLUNTARY
SERVITUDE, OR HUMAN TRAFFICKING FOR SEXUAL SERVITUDE, THE COURT
MAY, UPON MOTION OF A PARTY OR UPON ITS OWN MOTION, ORDER THAT THE
VICTIM-SURVIVOR'S TESTIMONY BE TAKEN IN A ROOM OTHER THAN THE
COURTROOM AND BE TELEVISED BY CLOSED-CIRCUIT TELEVISION IN THE
COURTROOM IF:
(I) THE TESTIMONY IS TAKEN DURING THE PROCEEDING;
(II) THE JUDGE DETERMINES PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(b)(II) OF
THIS SECTION THAT TESTIMONY BY THE VICTIM-SURVIVOR IN THE PRESENCE
OF THE DEFENDANT IN THE COURTROOM WOULD RESULT IN THE
VICTIM-SURVIVOR SUFFERING SERIOUS EMOTIONAL DISTRESS OR TRAUMA,
SUCH THAT THE VICTIM-SURVIVOR WOULD NOT BE ABLE TO REASONABLY
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-095

COMMUNICATE; AND
(III) CLOSED-CIRCUIT TELEVISION EQUIPMENT IS AVAILABLE FOR
TESTIMONY.
(b) (I) TO OBTAIN AN ORDER AUTHORIZING THE USE OF
CLOSED-CIRCUIT TELEVISION FOR TESTIMONY BY A VICTIM-SURVIVOR, A
PARTY SHALL FILE A WRITTEN MOTION WITH THE COURT NO LESS THAN
THIRTY-FIVE DAYS PRIOR TO THE TRIAL. THE COURT MAY EXTEND THE TIME
TO FILE A WRITTEN MOTION FOR GOOD CAUSE.
(II) THE COURT SHALL HOLD A HEARING TO DETERMINE WHETHER
TESTIMONY BY THE VICTIM-SURVIVOR IN THE PRESENCE OF THE DEFENDANT
IN THE COURTROOM WOULD RESULT IN THE VICTIM-SURVIVOR SUFFERING
SERIOUS EMOTIONAL DISTRESS OR TRAUMA, SUCH THAT THE
VICTIM-SURVIVOR WOULD NOT BE ABLE TO REASONABLY COMMUNICATE.
(c) ONLY THE PROSECUTING ATTORNEY, THE ATTORNEY FOR THE
DEFENDANT, AND THE JUDGE MAY QUESTION THE VICTIM-SURVIVOR WHEN
THE VICTIM-SURVIVOR TESTIFIES BY CLOSED-CIRCUIT TELEVISION.
(d) THE OPERATORS OF THE CLOSED-CIRCUIT TELEVISION EQUIPMENT
SHALL MAKE EVERY EFFORT TO BE UNOBTRUSIVE WHILE THE
VICTIM-SURVIVOR IS TESTIFYING.
(3) (a) ONLY THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUALS MAY BE IN THE ROOM
WITH THE VICTIM-SURVIVOR WHEN THE VICTIM-SURVIVOR TESTIFIES BY
CLOSED-CIRCUIT TELEVISION:
(I) THE PROSECUTING ATTORNEY;
(II) THE ATTORNEY FOR THE DEFENDANT;
(III) THE OPERATORS OF THE CLOSED-CIRCUIT TELEVISION
EQUIPMENT;
(IV) A PERSON WHOSE PRESENCE, IN THE OPINION OF THE COURT,
CONTRIBUTES TO THE WELFARE AND WELL-BEING OF THE VICTIM-SURVIVOR,
INCLUDING AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS DEALT WITH THE VICTIM-SURVIVOR IN
A THERAPEUTIC SETTING; AND
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-095

(V) THE JURY.
(b) DURING THE VICTIM-SURVIVOR'S TESTIMONY BY CLOSED-CIRCUIT
TELEVISION, THE JUDGE AND THE DEFENDANT, IF PRESENT, SHALL REMAIN IN
THE COURTROOM.
(c) THE JUDGE AND THE DEFENDANT MUST BE ALLOWED TO
COMMUNICATE WITH THE INDIVIDUALS IN THE ROOM WHERE THE
VICTIM-SURVIVOR IS TESTIFYING BY AN APPROPRIATE ELECTRONIC METHOD.
(4) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF THE DEFENDANT IS APPEARING
PRO SE.
(5) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF THE VICTIM-SURVIVOR
TESTIFYING IS, AT THE TIME OF A TRIAL, A CHILD LESS THAN EIGHTEEN YEARS
OLD OR IS A PERSON WHO HAS AN INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 25.5-10-202. CLOSED-CIRCUIT
TELEVISION TESTIMONY BY A VICTIM-SURVIVOR AT THE TIME OF TRIAL WHO
IS A CHILD LESS THAN EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD OR WHO HAS AN INTELLECTUAL
OR DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY IS GOVERNED BY SECTION 16-10-402.
(6) (a) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PRECLUDE, FOR PURPOSES OF
IDENTIFYING A DEFENDANT, THE PRESENCE OF BOTH THE VICTIM-SURVIVOR
AND THE DEFENDANT IN THE COURTROOM AT THE SAME TIME.
(b) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PRECLUDE THE REMOVAL OF THE
DEFENDANT, RATHER THAN THE VICTIM-SURVIVOR, FROM THE COURTROOM
UPON THE STIPULATION OF BOTH PARTIES AND THE APPROVAL OF THE COURT.
(c) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PRECLUDE A COURT FROM TAKING
OTHER, CONSTITUTIONALLY PERMISSIBLE MEASURES TO ACCOMMODATE THE
NEEDS OF A TESTIFYING VICTIM-SURVIVOR.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-31-315, amend
(1)(a) as follows:
24-31-315. Annual in-service training requirements.
(1) (a) The annual in-service training programs must include proper
restraint and holds training, a two-hour anti-bias training program, A
PAGE 9-SENATE BILL 26-095

TWO-HOUR TRAINING TO IMPROVE A PEACE OFFICER'S UNDERSTANDING OF
THE IMPACT OF TRAUMA ON VICTIM-SURVIVORS OF CRIMES AND THE
OPTIMAL WAY FOR A PEACE OFFICER TO RESPOND TO VICTIM-SURVIVORS
WHO ARE EXPERIENCING OR RESPONDING TO TRAUMA, and, in alternating
years, either a two-hour community policing and community partnerships
training program or a two-hour situation de-escalation training program.
The programs and curriculum may include interactive web-based training.
Each certified peace officer shall satisfactorily complete the training by July
1, 2017, and shall satisfactorily complete the training at least once every
five years thereafter.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-31-1401, amend
(1)(b), (2), (3)(c)(VI), (3)(c)(VII), and (3)(d); and add (3)(c)(VIII) and
(3)(c)(IX) as follows:
24-31-1401. Colorado sexual assault response review board -
creation - membership - duties - report - short title - definitions -
repeal.
(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(b) "Review board" means the Colorado sexual assault forensic
medical evidence RESPONSE review board, established in subsection (2) of
this section.
(2) The Colorado sexual assault forensic medical evidence
RESPONSE review board is established in the department to carry out the
duties described in subsection (6) of this section and submit the report
described in subsection (7) of this section.
(3) The board consists of:
(c) The following members, appointed by the attorney general:
(VI) Three representatives from organizations that provide services
or advocate for communities that experience disproportionate rates of
sexual assault; and
(VII) Up to three members, at the discretion of the attorney general,
whose contributions the attorney general determines would be valuable to
PAGE 10-SENATE BILL 26-095

the work of the review board; and
(VIII) A REPRESENTATIVE OF A MUNICIPAL CRIME LABORATORY; AND
(IX) TWO VICTIM-SURVIVORS, ONE REPRESENTING A RURAL
COMMUNITY AND ONE REPRESENTING A METRO AREA OR URBAN
COMMUNITY; AND
(d) The following members, appointed by the governor:
(I) A representative of the division of criminal justice in the
department of public safety who has oversight of the statewide sexual
assault evidence collection kit tracking system created in section
24-33.5-113.5; and
(II) A representative of the division of criminal justice in the
department of public safety who has oversight of federal and state victim
service funding and victim rights compliance; AND
(III) A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE CRIME LABORATORY OPERATED BY
THE COLORADO BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-122, amend
(1)(j)(I) as follows:
24-33.5-122. Peace officer training and support fund - peace
officer training and support distribution - first responder death benefit
administration - death benefit fund - rules - definitions - repeal.
(1) Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(j) (I) "Permissible purpose" means the initial and continuing
education and training for peace officers, INCLUDING TRAINING AND
EDUCATION FOR TRAUMA-INFORMED INVESTIGATIONS AND
VICTIM-SURVIVOR RESPONSE FOR PEACE OFFICERS, and the compensation of
peace officers.
SECTION 10. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 11-SENATE BILL 26-095

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 12-SENATE BILL 26-095